Maine, session 132, LD1542.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §900-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 23, §1, is further amended
to read:
§900-B. Advisory committee
There is established the Washington County Budget Advisory Committee as provided
in this section.
1. Municipal officers; election; term. The Except as provided in subsections 2 and
2-A, the municipal officers from each county commissioner district shall choose the budget
advisory committee members by the following procedure.
A. No later than 100 days before the end of the county's fiscal year, the county
commissioners shall notify all municipal officers in the county to caucus by county
commissioner districts at a specified date, time and place for the purpose of electing at
least one municipal officer from each district as a member of the budget advisory
committee; except that, in 1992, at least 3 municipal officers must be selected from
each district unless the municipal officers of a district decide that another person from
that district would be better qualified. A municipality may not be represented by more
than one officer at a time. The county commissioner shall serve as nonvoting
moderator for that district caucus. Nominations must be received from the floor. The
nominee receiving the most votes is approved as a budget advisory committee member
except that, in 1992, each caucus shall elect 3 members. The names of those elected
by the caucus must be recorded and forwarded to the county commissioners.
B. Budget advisory committee members serve 3-year terms except that, in 1992, one
member from each district must be elected for a one-year term, one member for a 2-
year term and one member for a 3-year term. If a budget advisory committee member
ceases to be a municipal officer during the term of membership, that committee
member vacates membership and the next district caucus shall elect a qualified
municipal officer to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Page 1 - 132LR1029(03)

A municipal officer elected as a member of the budget advisory committee may name a
designee to serve on the committee.
2. Legislative member. The Prior to October 15, 2025, the Washington County
legislative delegation shall annually select one member of the delegation who resides in
Washington County to serve as a nonvoting member on the budget advisory committee.
By October 15, 2025 and by October 15th of every odd-numbered year thereafter, the
Washington County legislative delegation shall select, by majority vote, one member of
the delegation who resides in Washington County to serve on the budget advisory
committee for a 2-year term as a voting member. If the selected member resigns from the
Legislature or from the budget advisory committee during the member's term of office, the
Washington County legislative delegation shall select, by majority vote, another member
of the delegation who resides in Washington County to serve the remainder of the term.
The Washington County legislative delegation may replace a member selected pursuant to
this subsection to serve on the budget advisory committee by a 2/3 vote of the delegation.
2-A. Member from unorganized territory. The county commissioners shall select,
by majority vote, one member who is a resident of the unorganized territory in Washington
County who has not served in or been employed by Washington County government within
the past 3 years and is not a current employee of Washington County government as a
voting member of the budget advisory committee to serve a 3-year term.
3. Chair. The budget advisory committee shall annually select one of its members to
chair the committee.
Page 2 - 132LR1029(03)